Illinois, session 104th, SB1391.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Sections 5-5e.1 and 14-12.6 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5e.1)7    Sec. 5-5e.1. Safety-Net Hospitals.8    (a) A Safety-Net Hospital is an Illinois hospital that:9        (1) is licensed by the Department of Public Health as 10    a general acute care or pediatric hospital; and11        (2) is a disproportionate share hospital, as described 12    in Section 1923 of the federal Social Security Act, as 13    determined by the Department; and14        (3) meets one of the following:15            (A) has a MIUR of at least 40% and a charity 16        percent of at least 4%; or17            (B) has a MIUR of at least 50%.18    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:19        (1) "Charity percent" means the ratio of (i) the 20    hospital's charity charges for services provided to 21    individuals without health insurance or another source of 22    third party coverage to (ii) the Illinois total hospital 23    charges, each as reported on the hospital's OBRA form.  SB1391- 2 -LRB104 09551 KTG 19614 b1        (2) "MIUR" means Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate 2    and is defined as a fraction, the numerator of which is the 3    number of a hospital's inpatient days provided in the 4    hospital's fiscal year ending 3 years prior to the rate 5    year, to patients who, for such days, were eligible for 6    Medicaid under Title XIX of the federal Social Security 7    Act, 42 USC 1396a et seq., excluding those persons 8    eligible for medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 9    1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) as set forth in paragraph 18 of 10    Section 5-2 of this Article, and the denominator of which 11    is the total number of the hospital's inpatient days in 12    that same period, excluding those persons eligible for 13    medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 14    1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) as set forth in paragraph 18 of 15    Section 5-2 of this Article.16        (3) "OBRA form" means form HFS-3834, OBRA '93 data 17    collection form, for the rate year.18        (4) "Rate year" means the 12-month period beginning on 19    October 1.20    (c) Beginning July 1, 2012 and ending on December 31, 212026, a hospital that would have qualified for the rate year 22beginning October 1, 2011 or October 1, 2012 shall be a 23Safety-Net Hospital.24    (c-5) Beginning July 1, 2020 and ending on December 31, 252026, a hospital that would have qualified for the rate year 26beginning October 1, 2020 and was designated a federal rural   SB1391- 3 -LRB104 09551 KTG 19614 b1referral center under 42 CFR 412.96 as of October 1, 2020 shall 2be a Safety-Net Hospital. 3    (d) No later than August 15 preceding the rate year, each 4hospital shall submit the OBRA form to the Department. Prior 5to October 1, the Department shall notify each hospital 6whether it has qualified as a Safety-Net Hospital.7    (e) The Department may promulgate rules in order to 8implement this Section.9    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as limiting 10the ability of the Department to include the Safety-Net 11Hospitals in the hospital rate reform mandated by Section 1214-11 of this Code and implemented under Section 14-12 of this 13Code and by administrative rulemaking. 14    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 15effective for dates of service on and after January 1, 2026, 16subject to federal approval, reimbursement rates for 17safety-net hospitals shall be revised as follows:18        (1) For inpatient hospital services, reimbursement 19    rates in effect January 1, 2025 under the All Patient 20    Refined-Diagnosis Related Groups system shall be increased 21    by 10% for safety-net hospitals. 22        (2) For outpatient hospital services, reimbursement 23    rates in effect January 1, 2025 under the Enhanced 24    Ambulatory Procedure Grouping system shall be increased by 25    10% for safety-net hospitals. 26    The Department shall take all actions necessary to ensure   SB1391- 4 -LRB104 09551 KTG 19614 b1the rate increases for safety-net hospitals authorized by this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are in effect for 3dates of service on and after January 1, 2026, including 4publishing all appropriate public notices, applying for 5federal approval of amendments to the Illinois Title XIX State 6Plan, and adopting administrative rules if necessary. 7(Source: P.A. 101-650, eff. 7-7-20; 101-669, eff. 4-2-21; 8102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 9    (305 ILCS 5/14-12.6 new)10    Sec. 14-12.6. Hospital services; rate increases. 11    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 12effective for dates of service on and after January 1, 2026, 13subject to federal approval, hospital reimbursement rates 14shall be revised as follows:15        (1) For inpatient hospital services, reimbursement 16    rates in effect January 1, 2025 under the All Patient 17    Refined-Diagnosis Related Groups system shall be increased 18    by 10%. 19        (2) For outpatient hospital services, reimbursement 20    rates in effect January 1, 2025 under the Enhanced 21    Ambulatory Procedure Grouping system shall be increased by 22    10%. 23    (b) The Department shall take all actions necessary to 24ensure the rate increases authorized in this amendatory Act of 25the 104th General Assembly are in effect for dates of service   SB1391- 5 -LRB104 09551 KTG 19614 b1on and after January 1, 2026, including publishing all 2appropriate public notices, applying for federal approval of 3amendments to the Illinois Title XIX State Plan, and adopting 4administrative rules if necessary.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.